Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB173.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 205 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "CMS" means the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services;
(b) "Department" means the Department for Medicaid Services;
(c) "KCHIP state plan" means the federally approved, legally binding contract between the
Commonwealth and CMS that outlines how the Commonwealth administers the Kentucky Children's
Health Insurance Program, commonly known as KCHIP;
(d) "Medicaid state plan" means the federally approved, legally binding contract between the
Commonwealth and CMS that outlines how the Commonwealth administers the state's medical
assistance program, commonly known as Medicaid; and
(e) "SPA" means a Medicaid state plan or KCHIP state plan amendment or a request for a state plan
amendment that has been submitted to CMS.
(2) (a) The Commonwealth's Medicaid state plan and KCHIP state plan shall be subject to an annual
legislative review in accordance with this section.
(b) The department shall, by July 1 of each year, submit to the Legislative Research Commission, for
referral to the Interim Joint Committee on Health Services and the Medicaid Oversight and Advisory
Board established in KRS 7A.273:
1. A copy of the current Medicaid state plan;
2. A copy of the current KCHIP state plan; and
3. A copy and summary of each Medicaid and KCHIP SPA that has been:
a. Approved by CMS;
b. Denied or rejected by CMS; and
c. Submitted to, but not yet approved or denied by, CMS;
since July 1 of the preceding calendar year.
(c) The Medicaid Oversight and Advisory Board shall, by August 31 of each year, on a date determined
by the co-chairs, review the Medicaid state plan, KCHIP state plan, and all Medicaid and KCHIP
SPAs submitted in accordance with paragraph (b) of this subsection, at which time representatives
from the department shall appear before, provide testimony to, and answer questions from the board
concerning the Medicaid state plan, the KCHIP state plan, and all Medicaid and KCHIP SPAs
submitted in accordance with paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(d) The Interim Joint Committee on Health Services shall, by October 31 of each year, on a date
determined by the co-chairs, review the Medicaid state plan, KCHIP state plan, and all Medicaid and
KCHIP SPAs submitted in accordance with paragraph (b) of this subsection, at which time
representatives from the department shall appear before, provide testimony to, and answer questions
from the committee concerning the Medicaid state plan, KCHIP state plan, all Medicaid and KCHIP
SPAs submitted in accordance with paragraph (b) of this subsection, and the department's response
to any recommendations made by the Medicaid Oversight and Advisory Board in accordance with
subsection (4) of this section.
(3) When submitting a copy and summary of a SPA to the Legislative Research Commission in accordance
with subsection (2)(b) of this section, the department shall include:
(a) A copy of all materials submitted to CMS related to the SPA;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(b) A summary of the change or changes sought by the SPA;
(c) A summary of how the SPA will improve the administration of the Medicaid or KCHIP program,
access to services, or the overall health of the Medicaid or KCHIP population;
(d) An explanation of the necessity of the SPA;
(e) A determination of whether or not the SPA was subject to the authorization requirements established
in KRS 205.5372 and an explanation of that determination; and
(f) An analysis of the anticipated fiscal and budgetary impacts of the SPA which shall include an
analysis of costs over a one (1), two (2), and five (5) year timeframe.
(4) Following a review conducted pursuant to subsection (2)(c) of this section, the Medicaid Oversight and
Advisory Board may, by a vote of a majority of the voting members appointed to the board under KRS
7A.276, make recommendations for changes to a state plan or SPA. If the board elects to make
recommendations for changes to a state plan or SPA, the board shall submit those recommendations in
writing to the Governor, the secretary of the cabinet, and the commissioner of the department within thirty
(30) calendar days from the date on which the review was conducted.
(5) (a) As part of a review conducted under subsection (2)(d) of this section of the Medicaid state plan,
KCHIP state plan, and all Medicaid and KCHIP SPAs submitted in accordance with subsection
(2)(b) of this section, the Interim Joint Committee on Health Services may, by a vote of a majority of
the members appointed to the committee, find a state plan to be, in part or in whole, deficient because
it:
1. Appears to be in conflict with an existing state statute governing the Medicaid or KCHIP
program, including but not limited to the requirements imposed under KRS 205.525;
2. Appears to be in conflict with federal law governing the Medicaid or CHIP program;
3. Appears to exceed the cabinet's or department's statutory authority, including but not limited
to restrictions imposed under KRS 205.5372;
4. Appears to impose an unreasonable burden on state government, Medicaid-participating
providers, or Medicaid beneficiaries;
5. Was submitted for review in a manner that does not fully comply with subsection (3) of this
section;
6. Fails to fully incorporate recommendations made by the Medicaid Oversight and Advisory
Board under subsection (4) of this section; or
7. Appears to be deficient in any other manner, except that the committee shall not find a state
plan to be deficient on the basis of a SPA that was:
a. Denied or rejected by CMS; or
b. Submitted to, but not yet approved or denied by, CMS.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a)7. of this subsection, the Interim Joint Committee on Health Services
may make recommendations to the Governor, secretary of the cabinet, commissioner of the
department, or the General Assembly related to a SPA that was denied or rejected by CMS or that has
been submitted to, but not yet approved by, CMS.
(c) If the Interim Joint Committee on Health Services finds the Medicaid state plan to be, in part or in
whole, deficient, the committee shall transmit to the Governor, the secretary of the cabinet, and the
commissioner of the department:
1. A copy of the finding of deficiency and other relevant findings, recommendations, or
comments; and
2. A request that the Governor determine whether the Medicaid or KCHIP state plan shall:
a. Be amended to resolve concerns identified by the committee that lead to its finding of
deficiency; or
b. Remain in effect notwithstanding the finding of deficiency.

CHAPTER 159 3
(6) The Governor shall transmit his or her determination on any request made under subsection (5)(c)2. of this
section to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the Interim Joint Committee on Health
Services and the Medicaid Oversight and Advisory Board within thirty (30) calendar days of the date on
which the Interim Joint Committee on Health Services found the Medicaid or KCHIP state plan, in part or
in whole, to be deficient.
(7) The department shall, within thirty (30) days after the effective date of this Act, publish to its website, in an
easily accessible manner:
(a) A copy of the current, in effect Medicaid and KCHIP state plans, including a clear notation of the
date of the most recent approved SPA to each plan; and
(b) A copy of each Medicaid and KCHIP SPA that has been submitted to CMS and the Legislative
Research Commission, as required under KRS 205.525, including a copy of the summary and
statement of benefits as required under KRS 205.525.
(8) Notwithstanding provisions of this section to the contrary:
(a) When conducting the initial legislative review of the Medicaid and KCHIP state plans in 2026, the
Medicaid Oversight and Advisory Board and the Interim Joint Committee on Health Services shall
review the Medicaid state plan and the KCHIP state plan in their entirety and may, by June 1, 2026,
request a summary, to be prepared in accordance with subsection (3) of this section, for any part of
the Medicaid state plan; and
(b) The department shall, within five (5) calendar days after the effective date of this Act, provide the
Legislative Research Commission with a copy of the current, in effect Medicaid and KCHIP state
plans for referral to the Interim Joint Committee on Health Services and the Medicaid Oversight and
Advisory Board.
Section 2. Whereas recently enacted federal changes to the Medicaid program and significant increases in
the Commonwealth's Medicaid budget over the last decade create an urgent need to bolster legislative oversight of
the Medicaid program, take immediate steps to comply with new federal requirements, and ensure that Medicaid
expenditures support the healthcare needs of only those individuals the program is intended to serve, an emergency is
declared to exist, and this Act takes effect upon its passage and approval by the Governor or upon its otherwise
becoming a law.
Veto Overridden April 14, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version